Utah statutes.
78B-2-108.   Effect of disability -- Minority or mental incompetence.
A person may not bring an action while under the age of majority or mentally
incompetent without a legal guardian.  During the time the person is underage
or incompetent, the statute of limitations for a cause of action other than
for the recovery of real property may not run.
